Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6268.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1621. (1) Except for actions Subject to subsections (2) and (3), and except as provided for in sections 1605, 1611, 1615, and 1629, and 1635, venue is determined as follows: (a) The county in which a defendant resides, has a place of business, or conducts business, or in which the registered office of a defendant corporation is located, the original cause of action arises and to which 1 or more of the following apply is a proper county in which to commence and try an action: . (i) A defendant resides in the county. (ii) A defendant has a place of business in the county. (iii) A defendant conducts business in the county. (iv) A defendant is a corporation and has a registered office in the county. (b) If none of the defendants meet 1 or more of the county in which the original cause of action arises does not meet at least 1 of the criteria in conditions listed under subdivision (a), the county in which a plaintiff resides or has a place of business, or in which the registered office of a plaintiff corporation is located, original cause of action arises and to which 1 or more of the following apply is a proper county in which to commence and try an action: . (i) A plaintiff resides in the county. (ii) A plaintiff has a place of business in the county. (iii) A plaintiff conducts business in the county. (iv) A plaintiff is a corporation and has a registered office in the county. (c) If the county in which the original cause of action arises does not meet at least 1 of the conditions listed under subdivision (a) or (b), a county to which both of the following apply is a proper county in which to commence and try an action: (i) One or more of the following apply: (A) A plaintiff resides in the county. (B) A plaintiff has a place of business in the county. (C) A plaintiff conducts business in the county. (D) A plaintiff is a corporation and has a registered office in the county. (ii) One or more of the following apply: (A) A defendant resides in the county. (B) A defendant has a place of business in the county. (C) A defendant conducts business in the county. (D) A defendant is a corporation and has a registered office in the county. (d) If no county meets the conditions under subdivision (a), (b), or (c), a county that meets the conditions under section 1627 is a proper county in which to commence and try an action. (2) (c) An action against a fiduciary appointed by court order shall must be commenced in the county in which the fiduciary was appointed. (3) A party may file a motion to change venue based on hardship or inconvenience. (4) For the purposes of this section, a county in which a defendant conducts business includes, but is not limited to, a county in which the defendant's product is sold at retail.